Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-730
Street railways; tracks; duty to repair; liability for injuries.

Track of all railway companies, when located upon the streets or avenues of the city, shall be kept in repair and safe in all respects for the use of the traveling public, and such companies shall be liable for all damages resulting by reason of neglect to keep such track in repair or for obstructing the streets or avenues of such city. For injuries to persons or property arising wholly from a failure of such companies to keep their tracks in proper repair and free from obstruction, such company shall be liable.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 106, p. 112;

R.S.1913, § 4539;

C.S.1922, § 3925;

C.S.1929, § 15-718;

R.S.1943, § 15-730.